Vermont, session 2025-2026, S225.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 2016 Acts and Resolves No. 157, Sec. H.12, as amended by 2022
Acts and Resolves No. 164, Sec. 5, 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 72, Sec. 39,
and 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 176, Sec. 1, is further amended to read:
Sec. H.12. VEGI; REPEAL OF AUTHORITY TO AWARD INCENTIVES
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the Vermont
Economic Progress Council shall not accept or approve an application for a
Vermont Employment Growth Incentive under 32 V.S.A. chapter 105,
subchapter 2 on or after January 1, 2027. [Repealed.]
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385468 v.1